Arkansas statutes. Title 8 Environmental Law
Chapter 7 Hazardous Substances
8-7-209. Powers and duties of the division and commission generally.

The Division of Environmental Quality shall have the following powers and duties:

To administer and enforce all laws and rules regarding hazardous waste management;

To conduct and publish such studies of hazardous waste management in this state as shall be deemed appropriate, including, but not limited to:

A description of the sources of hazardous waste generated within the state;

Information regarding the types and quantities of such hazardous waste; and

A description of current hazardous waste management practices and costs including treatment, recovery, and disposal;

To develop, publish, and implement plans in accordance with the provisions of this subchapter for the safe and effective management of hazardous waste within this state, including, but not limited to:

The establishment of criteria for the identification of those locations within the state which are suitable for establishment of hazardous waste treatment or disposal facilities or sites; and

Those locations which are not suitable for such purposes;

To establish criteria for determination of whether any waste or combination of wastes is hazardous for purposes of this subchapter and to identify and specify wastes or combination of wastes as being hazardous;

To issue, continue in effect, revoke, modify, or deny, under such conditions as it may prescribe, permits for the establishment, construction, operation, or maintenance of hazardous waste treatment, storage, or disposal facilities or sites, as more particularly prescribed by §§ 8-7-215 — 8-7-222;

To make such investigations and inspections and to hold such hearings, after notice, as the division may deem necessary or advisable for the discharge of the division’s duties under this subchapter and to ensure compliance with this subchapter and any orders and rules issued pursuant thereto;

To make, issue, modify, revoke, and enforce orders, after notice and hearing, prohibiting violation of any of the provisions of this subchapter or of any rules issued pursuant thereto or any permit issued thereunder, and requiring the taking of such remedial measures as may be necessary or appropriate to implement or effectuate the provisions and purposes of this subchapter;

To institute proceedings in the name of the division in any court of competent jurisdiction to compel compliance with and to restrain any violation of the provisions of this subchapter or any rules and orders issued pursuant thereto or any permit issued thereunder, and require the taking of such remedial measures as may be necessary or appropriate to implement or effectuate the provisions and purposes of this subchapter.

In any civil action in which a temporary restraining order, preliminary injunction, or permanent injunction is sought, it shall not be necessary to allege or prove at any stage of the proceeding that irreparable damage will occur should the requested relief not be granted, nor that the remedy at law is inadequate;

To initiate, conduct, and support research, demonstration projects, and investigations, and coordinate all state agency research programs pertaining to hazardous waste management, and establish technical advisory committees to assist in the development of procedures, standards, criteria, and rules, the members of which may be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with § 25-16-901 et seq.;

To establish policies and standards for effective hazardous waste management;

To establish standards and procedures for the certification of personnel to operate hazardous waste treatment or disposal facilities or any commercial hazardous waste management facilities; and

In addition to the powers enumerated in subdivisions (a)(1)-(11) of this section, the division shall have and may use in the administration and enforcement of this subchapter all of the powers which the division has under other laws administered by the division, including the Arkansas Water and Air Pollution Control Act, § 8-4-101 et seq., and the Arkansas Solid Waste Management Act, § 8-6-201 et seq.

The Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission shall have the following powers and duties:

To adopt, after notice and public hearing, and to promulgate, modify, repeal, and enforce rules regarding hazardous waste management as may be necessary or appropriate to implement or effectuate the purposes and intent of this subchapter and the powers and duties of the division under this subchapter, including, but not limited to, rules for:

The containerization and labeling of hazardous waste, which rules, to the extent practicable, shall be consistent with those issued by the United States Department of Transportation, the United States Environmental Protection Agency, the State Highway Commission, and the Arkansas Department of Transportation;

Establishing standards and procedures for the safe operation and maintenance of facilities;

Identifying those wastes or combination of wastes which are incompatible and which may not be stored or disposed of together and procedures for preventing the storage, disposal, recovery, or treatment of incompatible wastes together;

The reporting of hazardous waste management activities;

Establishing standards and procedures for the certification of supervisory personnel at hazardous waste treatment or disposal facilities or sites as required under § 8-7-219(3); and

Establishing a manifest system for the transport of hazardous waste and prohibiting the receipt of hazardous waste at storage, processing, recovery, disposal, or transport facilities or sites without a properly completed manifest;

In promulgation of such rules, prior to the submittal to public comment and review of any rule or change to any rule that is more stringent than federal requirements, the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission shall duly consider the economic impact and the environmental benefit of such rule on the people of the State of Arkansas, including those entities that will be subject to the rule.

The Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission shall promptly initiate rulemaking proceedings to further implement the analysis required under subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this section.

The extent of the analysis required under subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this section shall be defined in the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission's rulemaking required under subdivision (b)(1) of this section. It will include a written report which shall be available for public review along with the proposed rule in the public comment period.

Upon completion of the public comment period, the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission shall compile a rulemaking record or response to comments demonstrating a reasoned evaluation of the relative impact and benefits of the more stringent rule;

Promulgation of rules and procedures not otherwise governed by applicable law which the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission deems necessary to secure public participation in environmental decision-making processes;

Promulgation of rules governing administrative procedures for challenging or contesting division actions;

In the case of permitting or grants decisions, providing the right to appeal a permitting or grants decision rendered by the Director of the Division of Environmental Quality or his or her delegatee;

In the case of an administrative enforcement or emergency action, providing the right to contest any such action initiated by the director;

Instruct the director to prepare such reports or perform such studies as will advance the cause of environmental protection in the state;

Make recommendations to the director regarding overall policy and administration of the division, provided, however, that the director shall always remain within the plenary authority of the Governor; and

Upon a majority vote, initiate review of any director's decision.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 406, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-4204; Acts 1989, No. 643, § 4; 1997, No. 250, § 48; 1997, No. 1055, § 2; 1997, No. 1219, § 9; 2017, No. 707, § 9; 2019, No. 315, §§ 606-611; 2019, No. 693, § 18; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2719-2725.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 1997, No. 1055, § 1, provided: “The purpose of this act is to bring the state law into coordination with the existing federal law. The program of permitting hazardous waste transporters initiated through the existing state law has for many years proven an administrative burden on both the Department of Pollution Control and Ecology and on industry without providing any additional protection to the environment or public health. Therefore, this act will eliminate an unnecessary regulation while maintaining the integrity of the programs which provide the benefits of notice, monitoring, and enforcement.”

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment, in (b)(1)(A), inserted “United States” following “by the” and substituted “Department of Transportation” for “State Highway and Transportation Department”.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “and rules” for “rules and regulations” in (a)(1) and (a)(6); deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (a)(7), (a)(9), twice in the introductory language of (b)(1), and in (b)(4); rewrote (b)(2)(A); substituted “rule” for “regulation” in (b)(2)(D); and deleted “regulations” following “rules” in (b)(3).

The 2019 amendment by No. 693 substituted “in subdivisions (a)(1)-(11) of this section” for “above” in (a)(12).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” throughout the section.

8-7-210. Existing rules, etc.

All existing rules of the Division of Environmental Quality not inconsistent with the provisions of this subchapter relating to subjects embraced within this subchapter shall remain in full force and effect until expressly repealed, amended, or superseded by the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission, insofar as the rules do not conflict with the provisions of this subchapter.

All orders entered, permits granted, and pending legal proceedings instituted by the division relating to subjects embraced within this subchapter shall remain unimpaired and in full force and effect until superseded by actions taken by the division or commission under this subchapter.

No existing civil or criminal remedies, public or private, for any wrongful action shall be excluded or impaired by this subchapter.

The provisions of this subchapter and the rules promulgated pursuant to this subchapter shall govern if they conflict with the provisions of the Arkansas Water and Air Pollution Control Act, § 8-4-101 et seq., or the Arkansas Solid Waste Management Act, § 8-6-201 et seq., or any action taken by the division or commission under those laws.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 406, § 15; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-4215; Acts 2019, No. 315, §§ 612, 613; 2019, No. 910, § 2726.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (a) and (d).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a); and substituted “division” for “department” twice in (b) and in (c).

8-7-211. Variances, waivers, or extensions.

When the application of or compliance with any rule or regulation issued under this subchapter, in the judgment of the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission, would cause undue or unreasonable hardship to any person and not cause substantially adverse environmental effects, the commission may grant a variance, waiver, or extension to the same extent that such variance, waiver, or extension would be allowable under the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976, 42 U.S.C. § 6901 et seq., and the regulations promulgated thereunder. In no case shall the duration of any such variance exceed one (1) year. Renewals or extensions may be given only after opportunity for public comment on each such renewal or extension.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 406, § 14; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-4214; Acts 1989, No. 643, § 5.

8-7-212. Considerations in administration.

In administering the provisions of this subchapter, the Division of Environmental Quality may adopt and give appropriate effect to variations within this state in climate, geology, population density, and such other factors as may be relevant to the management of hazardous waste, the establishment of standards and permit conditions, and to the siting of permitted facilities.

To the extent practicable, the rules and procedures adopted by the division pursuant to this subchapter shall be consistent with other environmentally related rules and procedures of the division. In administering the provisions of this subchapter and of all other laws under the administration of the division, the division and the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission shall coordinate and expedite the issuance of permits required by an applicant under one (1) or more laws, to the end of eliminating, insofar as practicable, any duplication of unnecessary time and expense to the applicant and the division.

The division shall integrate all provisions of this subchapter with the appropriate provisions of all other laws which grant regulatory authority to the division for purposes of administration and enforcement and shall avoid duplication to the maximum extent practicable.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 406, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-4206; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 614; 2019, No. 910, § 2727.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “regulations” following “rules” twice in the first sentence in (b).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a); and substituted “division” for “department” throughout (b) and (c).

8-7-213. Procedure generally.

The procedure of the Division of Environmental Quality and the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission for issuance of rules, conduct of hearings, notice, power of subpoena, review of action on permits, right of appeal, presumptions, finality of actions, and related matters shall be as provided in § 8-4-101 et seq. and § 8-4-201 et seq., including, but not limited to, §§ 8-4-205, 8-4-210, 8-4-212 — 8-4-214, and 8-4-218 — 8-4-229 if they are not in conflict with the provisions set forth in this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 406, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-4209; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 615; 2019, No. 910, § 2728.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules”.

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality”.

8-7-214. Emergency order for imminent hazard.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this subchapter, the Director of the Division of Environmental Quality, upon finding that the storage, transportation, treatment, or disposal of any waste may present an imminent and substantial hazard to the health of persons or to the environment and that an emergency exists requiring immediate action to protect the public health and welfare, he or she may, without notice or hearing, issue an order reciting the existence of such an imminent hazard and emergency and requiring that such action be taken as he or she determines to be necessary to protect the health of such persons or the environment and to meet the emergency.

The order of the director may include, but is not limited to, directing the operator of the treatment or disposal facility or site or the custodian of the waste which constitutes the hazard to take such steps as are necessary to prevent the act or eliminate the practice which constitutes the hazard and, with respect to a facility or site, may order cessation of operation.

Any person to whom the order is directed shall comply with it immediately, but, on written application to the director within ten (10) days of the issuance of the order, that person shall be afforded a hearing before the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission within ten (10) days after receipt of the written request.

On the basis of the hearing, the commission shall continue the order in effect or shall revoke or modify it.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 406, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-4208; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 2729.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a)(1).

8-7-215. Permits — Requirement.

No person shall construct, substantially alter, or operate any hazardous waste treatment or disposal facility or site, nor shall any person store, treat, or dispose of any hazardous waste without first obtaining a permit from the Division of Environmental Quality for the facility, site, or activity.

Persons who construct, substantially alter, or operate a facility which generates hazardous waste shall be subject to the reporting requirements of this subchapter but shall not be required to obtain a permit under this subchapter unless such person also stores, treats, or disposes of hazardous waste.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 406, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-4205; Acts 1997, No. 1055, § 3; 2019, No. 910, § 2730.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 1997, No. 1055, § 1, provided:

“The purpose of this act is to bring the state law into coordination with the existing federal law. The program of permitting hazardous waste transporters initiated through the existing state law has for many years proven an administrative burden on both the Department of Pollution Control and Ecology and on industry without providing any additional protection to the environment or public health. Therefore, this act will eliminate an unnecessary regulation while maintaining the integrity of the programs which provide the benefits of notice, monitoring, and enforcement.”

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a).

8-7-216. Permits — Issuance generally — Interim operations.

A permit shall be issued under such terms and conditions as the Division of Environmental Quality may prescribe under this subchapter and under the terms and conditions the Arkansas Department of Transportation may prescribe for the transportation of hazardous waste.

[Repealed.]

A facility required to have a permit under this subchapter due to statutory or regulatory changes which occur after March 14, 1979, may continue in operation until such time as a permit is issued under this subchapter, provided that the owner or operator notifies the division of newly regulated activities at the facility within ninety (90) days of the effective date of each statutory or regulatory change and makes initial permit application within one hundred eighty (180) days of the effective date of such changes on forms provided by the division.

This subsection shall not apply to any facility at which interim operating authority or a final permit has previously been terminated or denied.

Interim operating authority acquired pursuant to subsection (b) of this section shall terminate for incineration facilities on November 8, 1989, unless the owner or operator applied for final permit determination by November 8, 1986.

Interim operating authority acquired pursuant to subsection (b) of this section shall terminate for storage and treatment facilities on November 8, 1992, unless the owner or operator applied for final permit determination by November 8, 1988.

Interim operating authority acquired pursuant to subsection (c) of this section for a land disposal facility shall terminate twelve (12) months after the land disposal facility first becomes subject to permitting unless the owner or operator certifies compliance with all applicable groundwater monitoring and financial responsibility requirements.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 406, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-4205; Acts 1989, No. 643, § 6; 1991, No. 489, § 1; 1991, No. 786, § 8; 1999, No. 340, § 2; 2017, No. 707, § 10; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2731, 2732.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1999, No. 340, § 1, provides: “Legislative intent. In drafting Act 643 of 1989, the General Assembly sought to allow for existing and newly-regulated hazardous waste management facilities to benefit from continued operation under interim status while their application for a treatment, storage, or disposal permit is being reviewed and processed for approval in exactly the same manner as provided for by the federal laws and regulations for these activities. As enacted, the language at § 8-7-216(d) and (e) would deny interim status to newly-regulated treatment, storage, and disposal facilities, a much more stringent requirement than envisioned in Act 643. The purpose of this Act is to achieve the legislative intent of Act 643 of 1989 and to restore equivalency of the state requirements with those of the federal government.”

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment, in (a), substituted “A permit” for “Permits”, deleted “the provisions of” preceding “this subchapter”, substituted “the terms” for “such terms”, and substituted “the Arkansas Department of Transportation” for “as the Arkansas State Highway and Transportation Department”.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a) and twice in (c)(1); and repealed (b).

8-7-217. Permits — Notice of hearing.

No permit shall be issued by the Division of Environmental Quality or the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission for any commercial hazardous waste treatment, storage, or disposal facility unless thirty (30) days' advance notice of a hearing has been placed in the largest newspaper published in the county in which a commercial hazardous waste treatment, storage, or disposal facility or facilities are located or proposed to be located, as well as published in the largest newspaper published in the adjoining counties. If there is no newspaper published in any of the counties so affected, the notice shall be published in the newspaper having the largest circulation in the county.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 406, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-4205; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 2733.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality”.

8-7-218. Permits — Compliance with subchapter, state and federal standards, regulations, etc.

No permits shall be issued by the Division of Environmental Quality for any facility unless the division, after opportunity for public comment, has determined that the facility has been designed and will be operated in such manner that any emission from the facility will comply with the provisions of this subchapter and all applicable state and federal standards and state rules and federal regulations concerning air and water quality and that the transfer, handling, and storage of materials within the facility will not cause conditions which would violate state and federal standards concerning worker safety or create unreasonable hazards to the environment or to the health and welfare of the people living and working in or near the facility.

No permit shall be issued by the division for any commercial disposal or storage facility off the site where the hazardous waste is generated until the division has adopted rules, standards, and procedures pursuant to § 8-7-209.

The rules, standards, procedures, or other requirements adopted and imposed by the division shall not be less stringent than the regulations promulgated or revised by the United States Environmental Protection Agency pursuant to the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976, 42 U.S.C. § 6901 et seq.

No permit shall be issued for hazardous waste treatment, storage, or disposal facilities except under the terms of rules of the division which conform to the provisions of § 3005 of the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976, 42 U.S.C. § 6925.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 406, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-4205; Acts 1989, No. 643, § 7; 1999, No. 1164, § 91; 2019, No. 315, § 616; 2019, No. 910, § 2734.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 inserted “state rules and federal” in (a); deleted “regulations” following “rules” twice in (b); and substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (c).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a); and substituted “division” for “department” throughout the section.

8-7-219. Permits — Commercial facilities — Terms and conditions.

No permit shall be issued for any commercial hazardous waste treatment, storage, or disposal facility unless that facility meets such terms and conditions as the Division of Environmental Quality may direct, including, but not limited to:

Evidence of liability insurance in such amount as the division may determine to be necessary for the protection of the public health and safety and the protection of the environment;

Evidence of financial responsibility in such form and amount as the division may determine to be necessary to ensure that, upon abandonment, cessation, or interruption of the operation of the facility, all appropriate measures are taken to prevent present and future damage to the public health and safety and to the environment;

Evidence that the personnel employed at the hazardous waste treatment or disposal facility meet such qualifications as to education and training as the division may determine to be necessary to assure the safe and adequate operation of the facility.

Persons charged with the direct supervision of the operation of any facility must be certified by the division as having such qualifications after a review of the types, properties, and volume of hazardous waste to be treated or disposed of at the facility.

The division may require the recertification of supervisory personnel when there is any significant change in the types or properties of hazardous waste being treated or disposed of in any facility;

Evidence of an appropriate preventive maintenance program, spill prevention plan, safety procedures, and contingency plans which have been developed in consultation with the fire department having jurisdiction and by the mayor or city manager of the municipality or by the county judge of the county in which the facility is to be located;

Evidence that the location of the facility is consistent with the siting criteria established by the division as provided in § 8-7-209(a)(3). The provisions of this subdivision (5) shall not apply to a treatment facility which began operation prior to the date of enactment of this act and which has an existing operating permit from the Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality, now the Division of Environmental Quality, or to any subsequent modifications to such treatment facility, provided that the owner of the treatment facility can demonstrate that the modifications do not materially increase the degree of hazards associated with the treatment facility; and

Evidence of such forms of assurance, including full fee ownership of lands, and all mineral rights thereto, to ensure that the owner of any hazardous waste landfill has the legal authority to commit the hazardous waste landfill to perpetual security.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 406, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-4205; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 2735.

Publisher's Notes.

In reference to the term “the date of enactment of this act,” Acts 1979, No. 406, was signed by the Governor and became effective on March 14, 1979.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in the introductory language; substituted “division” for “department” throughout the section; and in (5), substituted “division” for the first occurrence of “department”, and substituted “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality, now the Division of Environmental Quality” for the second occurrence of “department”.

8-7-220. Permits — Duration — Renewal.

Permits shall be issued for a period not to exceed ten (10) years. However, land disposal permits shall be reviewed five (5) years from the date of issuance or reissuance and shall be modified as necessary to assure that the facility continues to comply with the currently applicable laws and rules.

Permits shall be subject to renewal by the Division of Environmental Quality upon a showing that the facility has been operated in accordance with the terms of the permit, the rules applicable to such facility, and in compliance with all other provisions of this subchapter.

Nothing in this section shall preclude a permit from being reviewed and modified at any time during its term.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 406, § 5; 1985, No. 920, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-4205; Acts 1999, No. 1164, § 92; 2019, No. 315, § 617; 2019, No. 910, § 2736.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (a) and deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (b).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (b).

8-7-221. Permits — Revocation.

Any permit issued under §§ 8-7-215 — 8-7-220 shall be subject to revocation for failure of the permittee to comply with the terms and conditions of the permit, the rules of the Division of Environmental Quality applicable thereto, or the provisions of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 406, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-4205; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 618; 2019, No. 910, § 2737.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules”.

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality”.

8-7-222. Permits — Hearing upon denial, revocation, or modification.

Any person who is denied a permit by the Director of the Division of Environmental Quality or who has such permit revoked or modified shall be afforded an opportunity for a hearing by the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission in connection therewith upon written application made within thirty (30) days after service of notice of the denial, revocation, or modification.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 406, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-4205; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 2738.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality”.

8-7-223. Location of landfill.

No hazardous waste landfill disposal facility off the site of generation shall be located within one-half (½) mile of any occupied dwelling unless the applicant shall affirmatively demonstrate and the Division of Environmental Quality shall specifically find that, because of the nature and amounts of the materials to be placed in such hazardous waste landfill disposal facility, a lesser distance will provide adequate margins of safety even under abnormal operating conditions.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 406, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-4205; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 2739.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality”.

8-7-224. Rules for transporting hazardous waste.

Following notice and public hearing, the Arkansas Department of Transportation, in consultation with the Division of Environmental Quality, shall issue rules for the transportation of hazardous waste.

The rules shall be consistent with applicable rules and regulations issued by the United States Department of Transportation and with any rules and standards issued by the division under this subchapter.

The provisions of this section shall apply equally to those persons transporting hazardous waste generated by others and to those transporting hazardous waste they have generated themselves, or combinations thereof.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 406, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-4207; Acts 2017, No. 707, § 11; 2019, No. 315, § 619; 2019, No. 910, § 2740.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment redesignated (a) as (a)(1) and (a)(2); substituted “Department of Transportation” for “State Highway and Transportation Department” in (a)(1); and substituted “under” for “pursuant to” in (a)(2).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (a)(1) and following the first occurrence of “rules” in (a)(2); and deleted “regulations” following the last occurrence of “rules” in (a)(2).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a)(1) and (a)(2).

8-7-225. Records and examinations.

The owner or operator of any hazardous waste management facility or site shall notify the Division of Environmental Quality as to hazardous waste management activities in accordance with the requirements of this subchapter and rules, permits, and orders issued under this subchapter, and shall establish and maintain such records, make such reports, install, use, and maintain such monitoring equipment or methods, take such samples, perform such tests, and provide such other information to the division as the Director of the Division of Environmental Quality may reasonably require.

The division or any authorized employee or agent thereof may examine and copy any books, papers, records, or memoranda pertaining to the operation of the facility or site.

The division or any authorized employee or agent thereof may enter upon any public or private property for the purpose of obtaining information or conducting surveys or investigations necessary or appropriate for the purposes of this subchapter.

Any records, reports, or information obtained under this subchapter and any permits, permit applications, and related documentation shall be available to the public for inspection and copying.

Upon a showing satisfactory to the director that the records, reports, permits, documentation, information, or any part thereof would, if made public, divulge methods or processes entitled to protection as trade secrets, the director shall consider, treat, and protect the records, reports, or information as confidential.

As necessary to carry out the provisions of this subchapter, information afforded confidential treatment may be transmitted under a continuing claim of confidentiality to other officers or employees of the state or of the United States if the owner or operator of the facility to which the information pertains is informed of the transmittal and if the information has been acquired by the division under the provisions of this subchapter.

The provisions of subdivision (d)(2)(A) of this section shall not be construed to limit the division's authority to release confidential information during emergency situations.

Any violation of this subsection is a Class A misdemeanor.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 406, § 11; 1983, No. 809, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-4211; Acts 1989, No. 643, § 8; 2019, No. 315, § 620; 2019, No. 693, § 19; 2019, No. 910, § 2741.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (a).

The 2019 amendment by No. 693 substituted “is a Class A” for “shall be unlawful and
constitute a” in (d)(3).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” and “department” for “division” throughout the section.

Cross References.

Misdemeanors, § 5-1-107.

8-7-226. Fees — Fund established.

The Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission shall have authority to establish by rule a schedule of fees to recover the costs of processing permit applications and permit renewal proceedings, on-site inspections and monitoring, the certification of personnel to operate hazardous waste treatment, storage, or disposal facilities, and other activities of Division of Environmental Quality personnel which are reasonably necessary to assure that generators and transporters of hazardous waste and hazardous waste management facilities are complying with the provisions of this subchapter and which reasonably should be borne by the transporter, generator, or owner or operator of the hazardous waste management facility.

All fees collected pursuant to this section shall be dedicated to enabling the division to receive authorization to administer a hazardous waste management program in Arkansas pursuant to the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976, 42 U.S.C. § 6901 et seq., as amended by the Hazardous and Solid Waste Amendments of 1984.

The Hazardous Waste Permit Fund is established on the books of the Treasurer of State, the Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State. All fees collected under the provisions of this section shall be deposited into this fund.

The commission is hereby authorized to promulgate such rules as are necessary to administer the fees, rates, tolls, or charges for services established by this section and is directed to prescribe such fees, rates, tolls, or charges for the services delivered by the division or its successor in such manner as may be necessary to support the programs of the division as directed by the Governor and the General Assembly.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 406, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-4205; Acts 1989, No. 643, § 9; 1991, No. 1235, § 1; 1993, No. 1254, §§ 3, 5; 1997, No. 1219, § 9; 1999, No. 1164, § 93; 2019, No. 315, §§ 621, 622; 2019, No. 910, § 2742.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1993, No. 1254, § 5, codified as subsection (d) of this section, is also codified as §§ 8-1-103(5) and 8-1-105(c).

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rule” for “regulation” in (a); and deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (d).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a); and substituted “division” for “department” in (b) and twice in (d).

U.S. Code.

The Hazardous and Solid Waste Amendments of 1984, referred to in this section, are codified as 42 U.S.C. §§ 6901, 6902, 6905, 6912, 6915—6917, 6921—6931, 6933, 6935—6939, 6939a, 6941, 6943—6945, 6948, 6949a, 6956, 6962, 6972, 6973, 6976, 6979a, 6979b, 6982, 6984, 6991, and 6991a—6991i.

Cross References.

Hazardous Waste Permit Fund, § 19-6-434.